Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-705
Uniform tax books, records, and forms; approval.

The form of all schedules, books of instruction, assessment and tax books, records, and other forms which may be necessary or expedient for the proper administration of the property tax laws of the state shall be approved by the Tax Commissioner. All such schedules, forms, and documents shall be uniform throughout the several counties insofar as the same is possible and practicable. The Department of Revenue may provide forms on a reimbursement basis. Alterations to any prescribed form may be made only upon written application to and written approval from the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 25;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 45.